Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,147
Vehicle turning left; yield right-of-way.

The driver of a vehicle who intends to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or approaching so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-636;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 243.

In an intersection collision involving a vehicle turning left with a green light and a vehicle subsequently entering the intersection with a green light from the opposite direction, the determination of which vehicle was required to yield to the other pursuant to this section was a question of fact for the jury. Nguyen v. Rezac, 256 Neb. 458, 590 N.W.2d 375 (1999).

A driver is charged with exercising due diligence to determine whether it is safe to turn left on a roadway. Mitchell v. Kesting, 221 Neb. 506, 378 N.W.2d 188 (1985).

The degree of care required by this section was increased by the fact that the sun restricted the visibility of the left-turning driver. Ambrosio v. Price, 495 F.Supp. 381 (D. Neb. 1979).